Hawaii statutes.
§383-31 Posting of information. Each
employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in
the employer's employ printed statements concerning benefit rights, claims for
benefits, and such other matters relating to the administration of this chapter
as the department of labor and industrial relations may by regulation
prescribe. Each employer shall supply to such individuals copies of such
printed statements or other materials relating to claims for benefits when and
as the department may by regulation prescribe. Such printed statements and
other materials shall be supplied by the department to each employer without
cost to the employer. [L 1939, c 219, §6(a); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs
18; RL 1945, §4232; RL 1955, §93-30; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-31;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next